Washington statutes.
RCW 15.54.325

Commercial fertilizer registration—Required for distribution—Application—Fees.

(1) No person may distribute in this state a commercial fertilizer until it has been registered with the department by the producer, importer, or packager of that product.

(2) An application for registration must be made on a form furnished by the department and must include the following:

(a) The product name;

(b) The brand and grade;

(c) The guaranteed analysis;

(d) Name, address, and phone number of the registrant;

(e) A label for each product being registered;

(f) Identification of those products that are (i) waste-derived fertilizers, (ii) micronutrient fertilizers, or (iii) fertilizer materials containing phosphate;

(g) The concentration of each metal, for which standards are established under RCW 15.54.800, in each product being registered, unless the product is (i) anhydrous ammonia or a solution derived solely from dissolving anhydrous ammonia in water, (ii) a customer-formula fertilizer containing only registered commercial fertilizers, or (iii) a packaged commercial fertilizer whose plant nutrient content is present in the form of a single chemical compound which is registered in compliance with this chapter and the product is not blended with any other material. The provisions of (g)(i) of this subsection do not apply if the anhydrous ammonia is derived in whole or in part from waste such that the fertilizer is a "waste-derived fertilizer" as defined in RCW 15.54.270. Verification of a registration relied on by an applicant under (g)(iii) of this subsection must be submitted with the application;

(h) If a waste-derived fertilizer or micronutrient fertilizer, information to ensure the product complies with chapter 70A.300 RCW and the resource conservation and recovery act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq.; and

(i) Any other information required by the department by rule.

(3) All companies planning to mix customer-formula fertilizers shall include the statement "customer-formula grade mixes" under the column headed "product name" on the product registration application form. All customer-formula fertilizers sold under one brand name shall be considered one product.

(4) Registrations are issued by the department for a two-year period beginning on July 1st of a given year and ending twenty-four months later on July 1st, except that registrations issued to a registrant who applies to register an additional product during the last twelve months of the registrant's period expire on the next July 1st.

(5) An application for a new registration must be accompanied by a fee of one hundred fifty dollars for each product.

(6) Application for renewal of registration is due July 1st of each registration period and must be accompanied by a renewal fee of one hundred twenty dollars for each product. If an application for renewal is not received by the department by the due date, a late fee of fifty dollars per product is added to the original fee and must be paid by the applicant before the renewal registration may be issued. Payment of a late fee does not prevent the department from taking any action authorized by this chapter for the violation.

[ 2021 c 282 s 2; 2020 c 20 s 1002; 2008 c 292 s 1. Prior: 1999 c 383 s 1; 1999 c 382 s 1; 1998 c 36 s 4; 1993 c 183 s 3.]

NOTES:

Application date—Effective date—2021 c 282: See notes following RCW 15.54.275.

Effective date—1999 c 383: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999." [ 1999 c 383 s 5.]

Effective date—1999 c 382: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999." [ 1999 c 382 s 2.]

Short title—1998 c 36: See note following RCW 15.54.265.